Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2013YH (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 155 Section 1. Section 262.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 262.8 Meetings. 3 Meetings may be called by the board, by the president of the 4 board, or by the executive director of the board upon written 5 request of any five members thereof. A meeting shall not be 6 held if the student member of the board specified in section 7 262.1 is not present. 8